Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1087.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2952 of Title 68, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “owner” means the holder of the


subject real property.



Req. No. 976 Page 1


B. There shall be allowed a credit against the ad valorem tax


liability of an owner, pursuant to Section 2915 of Title 68 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, if the government of a county, city, or


municipality follows a policy, pattern, or practice of declining to


enforce existing laws, ordinances, or other regulations against


illegal camping, obstruction of public thoroughfares, loitering,


panhandling, public urination or defecation, or public consumption


of alcoholic beverages or illegal substances, or if the local


government maintains a public nuisance involving camping, loitering,


and pollution, and:


1. The fair cash value of the real property of the owner is


reduced by this policy, pattern, practice, or public nuisance; or


2. The owner incurs expenses to mitigate the effects on the


private real property of this policy, pattern, practice, or public


nuisance.


C. The amount of credit allowed pursuant to subsection B of


this section shall be, at the election of the owner, equal to


either:


1. The reduction in fair cash value of the real property


resulting from the policy, pattern, practice, or public nuisance of


the local government; or


2. The expenses incurred by the owner that were reasonably


necessary to mitigate the effects on the real property of the


policy, pattern, practice, or public nuisance.

Req. No. 976 Page 2


D. With respect to any county, city, or municipality for which


a credit is claimed pursuant to this section, the county treasurer


shall withhold from the distribution of monies pursuant to Section


2923 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes to the affected county,


city, or municipality the respective aggregate amount of credit


claimed pursuant to this section.


E. The credit provided for in this section shall not be allowed


for expenses or reductions in fair cash value resulting from:


1. Decisions by local authorities to exercise prosecutorial


discretion not to prosecute alleged offenders, if the decisions are


made on a case-by-case basis and the justification for each decision


is published on a monthly basis by the local authority;


2. An act of executive clemency;


3. Acts or omissions mandated by federal law; and


4. An act or omission taken pursuant to Section 683.9 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes.


F. For any challenge to a credit claimed pursuant to this


section, the county, city, or municipality shall bear the burden of


demonstrating that the actions taken are lawful or that the amount


of the credit claimed is unreasonable.


G. The owner shall not be required to submit any claim as a


prerequisite to demanding or receiving just compensation in the form


of a credit pursuant to this section.



Req. No. 976 Page 3


H. If the policy, pattern, or practice remains in place after


the owner claims a credit pursuant to this section, the owner shall


be entitled to a subsequent tax credit in a following year pursuant


to the provisions of this section, unless the relevant government


entity and the owner reach a settlement or the government entity


ceases the policy, pattern, or practice, or abates the public


nuisance.


I. An owner may claim the credit provided pursuant to this


section no more than once per year.


J. If the amount of the credit allowed pursuant to this section


exceeds the tax liability of the owner, the amount of the credit not


used as an offset against the tax liability for that year may be


carried forward as a credit for ten (10) subsequent years.


K. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall administer the provisions


of this section, including the furnishing of forms for submission of


a claim.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-976 QD 1/16/2025 3:25:23 PM











Req. No. 976 Page 4